Maryland, session 2026, HB0649.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
20–101.
(a) In Subtitles 1 through 11 of this title the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(b) “Commission” means the Commission on Civil Rights.
(c) “Complainant” means a person that files a complaint alleging a discriminatory
act under this title.

HOUSE BILL 649 3
(d) “Discriminatory act” means an act prohibited under:
(1) Subtitle 3 of this title (Discrimination in Places of Public
Accommodation);
(2) Subtitle 4 of this title (Discrimination by Persons Licensed or Regulated
by Maryland Department of Labor);
(3) Subtitle 5 of this title (Discrimination in Leasing of Commercial
Property);
(4) Subtitle 6 of this title (Discrimination in Employment);
(5) Subtitle 7 of this title (Discrimination in Housing); [or]
(6) SUBTITLE 7A OF THIS TITLE (DISCRIMINATION IN EDUCATION);
OR
[(6)] (7) Subtitle 8 of this title (Aiding, Abetting, or Attempting
Discriminatory Act; Obstructing Compliance).
(e) “Gender identity” means the gender–related identity, appearance, expression,
or behavior of a person, regardless of the person’s assigned sex at birth, which may be
demonstrated by:
(1) consistent and uniform assertion of the person’s gender identity; or
(2) any other evidence that the gender identity is sincerely held as part of
the person’s core identity.
(f) “Military status” means the status of being:
(1) a member of the uniformed services;
(2) a member of a reserve component of the uniformed services; or
(3) a dependent, as defined in 50 U.S.C. § 3911(4).
(g) “Protective hairstyle” includes braids, twists, and locks.
(h) “Race” includes traits associated with race, including hair texture, afro
hairstyles, and protective hairstyles.
(i) (1) “Respondent” means a person accused in a complaint of a
discriminatory act.

HOUSE BILL 649
(2) “Respondent” includes a person identified during an investigation of a
complaint and joined as an additional or substitute respondent.
(j) “Sexual orientation” means the identification of an individual as to male or
female homosexuality, heterosexuality, or bisexuality.
SUBTITLE 7A. DISCRIMINATION IN EDUCATION.
20–7A–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “DISABILITY” MEANS:
(I) A PHYSICAL OR MENTAL IMPAIRMENT THAT
SUBSTANTIALLY LIMITS ONE OR MORE OF AN INDIVIDUAL’S MAJOR LIFE ACTIVITIES;
(II) A RECORD OF HAVING A PHYSICAL OR MENTAL IMPAIRMENT
THAT SUBSTANTIALLY LIMITS ONE OR MORE OF AN INDIVIDUAL’S MAJOR LIFE
ACTIVITIES; OR
(III) BEING REGARDED AS HAVING A PHYSICAL OR MENTAL
IMPAIRMENT THAT SUBSTANTIALLY LIMITS ONE OR MORE OF AN INDIVIDUAL’S
MAJOR LIFE ACTIVITIES.
(2) “DISABILITY” INCLUDES ANY CONDITION THAT REQUIRES A
STUDENT TO HAVE AN INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM UNDER THE FEDERAL
INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES EDUCATION ACT, A § 504 PLAN UNDER THE
FEDERAL REHABILITATION ACT OF 1973, OR ANY OTHER SPECIAL EDUCATION OR
RELATED SERVICES.
(C) (1) “EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTION” MEANS A PUBLIC OR NONPUBLIC:
(I) PREKINDERGARTEN PROGRAM;
(II) ELEMENTARY SCHOOL;
(III) SECONDARY SCHOOL;
(IV) INSTITUTION OF POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION, AS DEFINED
IN § 10–101 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE;

HOUSE BILL 649 5
(V) INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION, AS DEFINED IN §
10–101 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE; OR
(VI) OTHER EDUCATIONAL PROGRAM WITH AN ORGANIZED
COURSE OF STUDY THAT LEADS TO THE AWARD OF A CERTIFICATE, DIPLOMA, OR
DEGREE.
(2) “EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTION” INCLUDES THE GOVERNING BODY
RESPONSIBLE FOR THE ADMINISTRATION OF ANY SCHOOL OR PROGRAM DESCRIBED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(D) “MARITAL STATUS” MEANS THE STATE OF BEING SINGLE, MARRIED,
SEPARATED, DIVORCED, OR WIDOWED.
(E) “NATIONAL ORIGIN” INCLUDES ATTRIBUTES ASSOCIATED WITH
NATIONAL ORIGIN, INCLUDING ENGLISH LEARNER STATUS.
20–7A–02.
IT IS THE POLICY OF THE STATE THAT ALL INDIVIDUALS SHALL HAVE EQUAL
OPPORTUNITY FOR EDUCATION.
20–7A–03.
(A) THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(1) WITH RESPECT TO DISCRIMINATION ON THE BASIS OF SEX, AN
EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTION THAT LIMITS ADMISSION TO STUDENTS OF ONLY ONE
SEX;
(2) WITH RESPECT TO DISCRIMINATION ON THE BASIS OF RELIGION,
A NONPUBLIC EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTION THAT IS AFFILIATED WITH A RELIGIOUS
INSTITUTION THAT PERFORMS ANY ACTION LISTED UNDER § 26–702(2)(I) THROUGH
(V) OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE; OR
(3) WITH RESPECT TO DISCRIMINATION ON THE BASIS OF A
DISABILITY, A NONPUBLIC EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTION THAT IS IN COMPLIANCE
WITH § 504 OF THE FEDERAL REHABILITATION ACT OF 1973 OR THE FEDERAL
AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT, AS APPLICABLE.
(B) THIS SUBTITLE:
(1) IS AN EXERCISE OF THE POLICE POWER OF THE STATE FOR THE
PROTECTION OF THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE;

HOUSE BILL 649
(2) MAKES THE COMMISSION A STATE EDUCATIONAL AUTHORITY
UNDER THE FEDERAL FAMILY EDUCATIONAL RIGHTS AND PRIVACY ACT; AND
(3) SHALL, BEGINNING 30 DAYS AFTER THE COMMISSION ADOPTS
INITIAL REGULATIONS UNDER § 20–7A–05 OF THIS SUBTITLE, BE ADMINISTERED
AND ENFORCED BY THE COMMISSION AND, AS PROVIDED IN THIS TITLE, ENFORCED
BY THE APPROPRIATE STATE COURT.
20–7A–04.
(A) AN EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTION MAY NOT EXCLUDE AN INDIVIDUAL
FROM PARTICIPATION IN, DENY A PERSON THE BENEFITS OF, OR SUBJECT AN
INDIVIDUAL TO DISCRIMINATION WITHIN, ANY PROGRAM OR ACTIVITY OF THE
EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTION ON THE BASIS OF RACE, COLOR, NATIONAL ORIGIN,
ETHNICITY, ANCESTRY, RELIGION, SEX, PREGNANCY, SEXUAL ORIENTATION,
GENDER IDENTITY, DISABILITY, AGE, OR MARITAL STATUS.
(B) THE PROHIBITION AGAINST DISCRIMINATION UNDER SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION INCLUDES ANY CONTRACTUAL OR OTHER ARRANGEMENT MADE BY
AN EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTION THAT:
(1) USES CRITERIA OR METHODS OF ADMINISTRATION THAT HAVE
THE EFFECT OF SUBJECTING AN INDIVIDUAL TO DISCRIMINATION BECAUSE OF THE
INDIVIDUAL’S RACE, COLOR, NATIONAL ORIGIN, ETHNICITY, ANCESTRY, RELIGION,
SEX, PREGNANCY, SEXUAL ORIENTATION, GENDER IDENTITY, DISABILITY, AGE, OR
MARITAL STATUS; AND
(2) RESULTS IN DEFEATING OR SUBSTANTIALLY IMPAIRING
ACCOMPLISHMENT OF THE OBJECTIVES OF A PROGRAM OR AN ACTIVITY OF THE
EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTION WITH RESPECT TO INDIVIDUALS OF A PARTICULAR
RACE, COLOR, NATIONAL ORIGIN, ETHNICITY, ANCESTRY, RELIGION, SEX,
PREGNANCY STATUS, SEXUAL ORIENTATION, GENDER IDENTITY, DISABILITY, AGE,
OR MARITAL STATUS.
(C) AN EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTION MAY NOT INTIMIDATE, THREATEN,
COERCE, OR DISCRIMINATE AGAINST ANY INDIVIDUAL:
(1) FOR THE PURPOSE OF INTERFERING WITH ANY RIGHT OR
PRIVILEGE SECURED BY THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(2) BECAUSE THE INDIVIDUAL HAS MADE A COMPLAINT OR
TESTIFIED, ASSISTED, OR PARTICIPATED IN ANY MANNER IN AN INVESTIGATION, A

HOUSE BILL 649 7
PROCEEDING, OR A HEARING THAT ARISES FROM ALLEGED BEHAVIOR PROHIBITED
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
20–7A–05.
THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS
SUBTITLE.
20–1004.
(a) Any person claiming to be aggrieved by an alleged discriminatory act may file
a complaint with the Commission.
(b) The complaint shall:
(1) be in writing;
(2) state:
(i) the name and address of the person or State or local unit alleged
to have committed the discriminatory act; and
(ii) the particulars of the alleged discriminatory act;
(3) contain any other information required by the Commission; and
(4) be signed by the complainant under oath.
(c) (1) (i) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, a
complaint shall be filed within 6 months after the date on which the alleged discriminatory
act occurred.
(ii) A complaint filed with a federal or local human relations
commission within 6 months after the date on which the alleged discriminatory act occurred
shall be deemed to have complied with subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(2) (i) A complaint alleging an unlawful employment practice other
than harassment shall be filed within 300 days after the date on which the alleged
discriminatory act occurred.
(ii) A complaint filed with a federal human relations commission
within 6 months or a local human relations commission within 300 days shall be deemed
to have complied with subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(3) (i) A complaint alleging harassment against an employer shall be
filed within 2 years after the date on which the alleged harassment occurred.

HOUSE BILL 649
(ii) A complaint filed with a federal human relations commission
within 6 months or a local human relations commission within 2 years after the date on
which the alleged harassment occurred shall be deemed to have complied with
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(d) The Commission, on its own motion, and by action of at least three
commissioners, may issue a complaint in its name in the same manner as if the complaint
had been filed by an individual, if:
(1) the Commission has received reliable information from an individual
that a person has been or is engaged in a discriminatory act; and
(2) after a preliminary investigation by the Commission’s staff authorized
by the chair or vice–chair, the Commission is satisfied that the information warrants the
filing of a complaint.
20–1013.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “DISCRIMINATORY EDUCATIONAL PRACTICE” MEANS
AN ACT THAT IS PROHIBITED UNDER § 20–7A–04 OF THIS TITLE.
(B) IN ADDITION TO A COMPLAINT MADE WITH THE COMMISSION UNDER §
20–1004 OF THIS SUBTITLE, BEGINNING 30 DAYS AFTER THE COMMISSION ADOPTS
INITIAL REGULATIONS UNDER § 20–7A–05 OF THIS TITLE, AN INDIVIDUAL ALLEGING
A DISCRIMINATORY EDUCATIONAL PRACTICE MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION.
(C) (1) BEGINNING 30 DAYS AFTER THE COMMISSION ADOPTS INITIAL
REGULATIONS UNDER § 20–7A–05 OF THIS TITLE, IF A COMPLAINT FOR A
DISCRIMINATORY EDUCATIONAL PRACTICE HAS BEEN BROUGHT BEFORE THE
COMMISSION UNDER § 20–1004 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE COMMISSION MAY ELECT
TO BRING A CIVIL ACTION ON THE COMMISSION’S OWN BEHALF, IF:
(I) THE COMMISSION HAS FOUND PROBABLE CAUSE TO
BELIEVE THAT THE RESPONDENT HAS ENGAGED OR IS ENGAGING IN A
DISCRIMINATORY EDUCATIONAL PRACTICE; AND
(II) THERE IS A FAILURE TO REACH AN AGREEMENT TO REMEDY
AND ELIMINATE THE DISCRIMINATORY EDUCATIONAL PRACTICE.
(2) IF THE COMMISSION ELECTS TO BRING A CIVIL ACTION ON THE
COMMISSION’S OWN BEHALF, THE COMMISSION SHALL GIVE NOTICE OF THE
ELECTION TO ALL COMPLAINANTS AND RESPONDENTS.

HOUSE BILL 649 9
(D) A CIVIL ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE FILED IN THE CIRCUIT
COURT FOR THE COUNTY WHERE THE ALLEGED DISCRIMINATORY EDUCATIONAL
PRACTICE OCCURRED.
(E) THE FILING OF A CIVIL ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION AUTOMATICALLY
TERMINATES ANY PROCEEDING BEFORE THE COMMISSION BASED ON THE
UNDERLYING COMPLAINT.
(F) IF THE COURT FINDS THAT A DISCRIMINATORY EDUCATIONAL
PRACTICE OCCURRED, THE COURT MAY PROVIDE THE FOLLOWING REMEDIES:
(1) ENJOINING THE DEFENDANT FROM ENGAGING IN THE
DISCRIMINATORY EDUCATIONAL PRACTICE;
(2) ORDERING APPROPRIATE AFFIRMATIVE RELIEF;
(3) AWARDING COMPENSATORY DAMAGES;
(4) ORDERING PUNITIVE DAMAGES, IF:
(I) THE DEFENDANT IS NOT A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT OR
POLITICAL SUBDIVISION; AND
(II) THE COURT FINDS THAT THE DEFENDANT HAS ENGAGED OR
IS ENGAGING IN A DISCRIMINATORY EDUCATIONAL PRACTICE WITH ACTUAL
MALICE; AND
(5) ORDERING ANY OTHER EQUITABLE RELIEF THAT THE COURT
CONSIDERS APPROPRIATE.
Article – Education
11–409.
IF THE COMMISSION RECEIVES A COMPLAINT THAT AN INDIVIDUAL WAS
EXCLUDED FROM PARTICIPATION IN, DENIED THE BENEFITS OF, OR SUBJECTED TO
DISCRIMINATION IN AN INSTITUTION OF POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION BECAUSE OF
RACE, COLOR, NATIONAL ORIGIN, ETHNICITY, ANCESTRY, RELIGION, SEX,
PREGNANCY, SEXUAL ORIENTATION, GENDER IDENTITY, DISABILITY, AGE, OR
MARITAL STATUS, THE COMMISSION SHALL REFER ANY INFORMATION RECEIVED
ABOUT THE ALLEGED DISCRIMINATION TO THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS FOR
INVESTIGATION.
12–124.

HOUSE BILL 649
IF THE BOARD OF REGENTS RECEIVES A COMPLAINT THAT AN INDIVIDUAL
WAS EXCLUDED FROM PARTICIPATION IN, DENIED THE BENEFITS OF, OR
SUBJECTED TO DISCRIMINATION IN A CONSTITUENT INSTITUTION BECAUSE OF
RACE, COLOR, NATIONAL ORIGIN, ETHNICITY, ANCESTRY, RELIGION, SEX,
PREGNANCY, SEXUAL ORIENTATION, GENDER IDENTITY, DISABILITY, AGE, OR
MARITAL STATUS, THE BOARD SHALL REFER ANY INFORMATION RECEIVED ABOUT
THE ALLEGED DISCRIMINATION TO THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS FOR
INVESTIGATION.
26–702.
This subtitle does not apply to:
(1) With respect to discrimination on the basis of sex, a prekindergarten
program or school that limits admission to students of only one sex;
(2) With respect to discrimination on the basis of religion, a nonpublic
prekindergarten program or nonpublic school that is affiliated with a religious institution:
(i) Providing instruction on the religious beliefs of the religion with
which the program or school is affiliated;
(ii) Declining to provide instruction in beliefs that are different from
the religion with which the program or school is affiliated;
(iii) Requiring student attendance at religious events inherent to the
religion with which the program or school is affiliated;
(iv) Limiting admissions to or having a preference in admissions for
a student of certain religious beliefs or a student who is a member or is part of a family that
is a member of the religious institution affiliated with the program or school, if the program
or school has had the limitation or preference continually since the date on which the
program or school was established; or
(v) Granting tuition discounts for a student of certain religious
beliefs or who is a member or is part of a family that is a member of the religious institution
affiliated with the program or school if the practice of granting the discounts was
established the later of before July 1, 2022, or since the date on which the program or school
was established; and
(3) With respect to discrimination on the basis of disability, a nonpublic
prekindergarten program or nonpublic school that is in compliance with § 504 of the federal
Rehabilitation Act of 1973 or the federal Americans with Disabilities Act, as applicable.
26–704.

HOUSE BILL 649 11
(a) This section applies to:
(1) A county board;
(2) A public prekindergarten program;
(3) A public primary or secondary school;
(4) A nonpublic prekindergarten program that receives State funds; and
(5) A nonpublic primary or secondary school that receives State funds.
(b) An entity listed under subsection (a) of this section may not:
(1) Discriminate against a current student, a prospective student, or the
parent or guardian of a current or prospective student on the basis of race, ethnicity, color,
religion, sex, age, national origin, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or
disability;
(2) Refuse enrollment of a prospective student, expel a current student, or
withhold privileges from a current student, a prospective student, or the parent or guardian
of a current or prospective student because of an individual’s race, ethnicity, color, religion,
sex, age, national origin, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or disability;
or
(3) Discipline, invoke a penalty against, or take any other retaliatory action
against a student or parent or guardian of a student who files a complaint alleging that the
program or school discriminated against the student, regardless of the outcome of the
complaint.
(c) An entity listed under subsection (a) of this section shall print in its student
handbook the following statement:
“It is the policy of the State of Maryland that all public and publicly funded schools
and school programs operate in compliance with:
(1) Title VI of the federal Civil Rights Act of 1964; and
(2) Title 26, Subtitle 7 of the Education Article of the Maryland Code,
which states that public and publicly funded schools and programs may not:
(i) Discriminate against a current student, a prospective student, or
the parent or guardian of a current or prospective student on the basis of race, ethnicity,
color, religion, sex, age, national origin, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity,
or disability;

HOUSE BILL 649
(ii) Refuse enrollment of a prospective student, expel a current
student, or withhold privileges from a current student, a prospective student, or the parent
or guardian of a current or prospective student because of an individual’s race, ethnicity,
color, religion, sex, age, national origin, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity,
or disability; or
(iii) Discipline, invoke a penalty against, or take any other retaliatory
action against a student or parent or guardian of a student who files a complaint alleging
that the program or school discriminated against the student, regardless of the outcome of
the complaint.”.
26–705.
(a) (1) A person alleging discrimination in violation of § 26–704 of this subtitle
may file a complaint with [the]:
(I) THE State Superintendent IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SECTION; OR
(II) THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS, BEGINNING 30 DAYS
AFTER THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS ADOPTS INITIAL REGULATIONS, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 26–706 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) A complaint filed WITH THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT under
[paragraph (1) of] this subsection shall specify the relief or remedy requested.
(3) (I) A parent or guardian MAY FILE A COMPLAINT WITH THE
STATE SUPERINTENDENT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION ON BEHALF of [a]:
1. A minor [alleging discrimination may submit a complaint
under this subsection on behalf of the minor]; OR
2. A STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY WHO HAS REACHED
THE AGE OF 18 YEARS, WHO REMAINS ENROLLED IN A SECONDARY EDUCATION
PROGRAM, AND WHOSE RIGHTS REMAIN WITH A PARENT OR GUARDIAN UNDER THE
FEDERAL INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES EDUCATION ACT.
(II) THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS MAY FILE A
COMPLAINT WITH THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT ALLEGING DISCRIMINATION IN
VIOLATION OF § 26–704 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(4) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT SHALL TREAT A REFERRAL FROM
THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 26–706 OF THIS
SUBTITLE IN THE SAME MANNER AS A COMPLAINT RECEIVED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION.

HOUSE BILL 649 13
(b) (1) [On] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, ON receipt of a complaint under subsection (a) of this section, the State
Superintendent shall provide notice of the complaint to:
[(1)] (I) The program or school that is the subject of the complaint; [and]
[(2)] (II) The county board for the county in which the public
prekindergarten program or public primary or secondary school is located; AND
(III) THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS.
(2) UNLESS A COMPLAINANT OBJECTS, THE STATE
SUPERINTENDENT SHALL PROVIDE THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS WITH ALL
INFORMATION REGARDING A COMPLAINT ALLEGING DISCRIMINATION IF THE
COMMISSION REQUESTS THE INFORMATION.
(3) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT MAY, AT THE DISCRETION OF THE
STATE SUPERINTENDENT, REFER A COMPLAINT BROUGHT UNDER SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION TO THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS TO BE HEARD IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 26–706 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(c) Within 30 days [of] AFTER receiving a notice under subsection [(b)] (B)(1) of
this section, the program or school and, if appropriate, county board shall submit a response
to the State Superintendent.
(d) (1) (i) The State Superintendent shall attempt to mediate an
agreement between the complainant and respondent to remedy and eliminate the
discrimination.
(II) THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS MAY ASSIST WITH
MEDIATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, INCLUDING
BY:
1. IF A COMPLAINT WAS SUBMITTED BY THE
COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS, REPRESENTING THE POLICY OF THE STATE
AGAINST DISCRIMINATION IN EDUCATION AS PART OF THE MEDIATION PROCESS
BEFORE THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT; AND
2. MAKING RECOMMENDATIONS FOR REMEDYING AND
ELIMINATING DISCRIMINATORY PRACTICES.
[(ii)] (III) If mediation under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph
results in an agreement between the parties, the State Superintendent shall issue to both

HOUSE BILL 649
parties a written statement of the mediation findings and agreement, including the
timeline within which any agreed actions must be taken.
(2) (i) If a mediation agreement is not reached under paragraph (1) of
this subsection within 60 days after the complaint is filed, the State Superintendent shall
issue a decision on the complaint to both parties.
(ii) A decision issued under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall:
1. Be in writing;
2. Contain any findings of fact determined by the State
Superintendent; and
3. Specify any actions necessary to remedy or eliminate the
discrimination, including the timeline within which the actions must be taken.
(III) THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS MAY ASSIST WITH A
DECISION ISSUED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH BY MAKING
RECOMMENDATIONS ON REMEDYING AND ELIMINATING DISCRIMINATORY
PRACTICES.
[(iii)] (IV) If the State Superintendent finds that a county board,
program, or school violated § 26–704 of this subtitle, a decision issued under subparagraph
(i) of this paragraph may require the Comptroller to withhold funding from the program or
school in an amount determined by the State Superintendent in accordance with § 2–303(b)
of this article.
(e) (1) A complainant alleging that a county board, program, or school did not
remedy or eliminate the discrimination as agreed or required under subsection (d) of this
section may reopen a complaint made under this section without:
(i) Filing a new complaint under subsection (a) of this section; or
(ii) Engaging in mediation under subsection (d)(1) of this section.
(2) If the State Superintendent finds that a county board, program, or
school did not remedy or eliminate the discrimination as agreed or required under
subsection (d) of this section, the State Superintendent shall issue an updated written
decision to both parties requiring the Comptroller to withhold funding from the program or
school in an amount determined by the State Superintendent in accordance with § 2–303(b)
of this article.
(f) A complainant [or], A respondent, OR THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS,
IF THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS SUBMITTED THE COMPLAINT, may appeal to
the Office of Administrative Hearings:

HOUSE BILL 649 15
(1) Within 10 days after receiving a decision issued by the State
Superintendent under subsection (d)(2) of this section; or
(2) If the State Superintendent does not issue a decision as required under
subsection (d)(2) of this section, within 10 days after the date by which the decision should
have been issued.
(g) (1) An appeal hearing shall be held in the county where the alleged
discriminatory act occurred.
(2) If, after reviewing all of the evidence, the administrative law judge finds
that the respondent has engaged in discrimination, the administrative law judge shall:
(i) Issue a decision and order stating the judge’s findings of fact and
conclusions of law; and
(ii) Issue and cause to be served on the respondent an order
requiring the respondent to:
1. Cease and desist from engaging in the discrimination; and
2. Take affirmative action to effectuate the purposes of this
subtitle.
(h) (1) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION AND SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE State
Board, in consultation with the State Superintendent, shall adopt regulations to establish
procedures for complaint processing, mediation, and enforcement and otherwise carry out
the requirements of this section.
(2) THE STATE BOARD AND THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT SHALL
DEFER TO THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS ON:
(I) INTERPRETATIONS OF WHETHER AN ACT CONSTITUTES
DISCRIMINATION; AND
(II) THE AUTHORITY OF THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS
UNDER § 26–706 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) THE STATE BOARD, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE STATE
SUPERINTENDENT, AND THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS SHALL JOINTLY SET
GUIDELINES FOR DETERMINING WHEN ALLEGATIONS OF DISCRIMINATORY
PRACTICES ARE SUFFICIENT TO WARRANT MEDIATION UNDER THIS SECTION.
26–706.

HOUSE BILL 649
(A) THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS HAS CONCURRENT JURISDICTION
WITH THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT OVER ENFORCEMENT OF THE PROHIBITIONS
ON DISCRIMINATION UNDER § 26–704 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) A PERSON ALLEGING DISCRIMINATION IN VIOLATION OF § 26–704
OF THIS SUBTITLE MAY FILE A COMPLAINT WITH:
(I) THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS, BEGINNING 30 DAYS
AFTER THE ADOPTION OF INITIAL REGULATIONS UNDER SUBSECTION (I) OF THIS
SECTION, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION; OR
(II) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
26–705 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) A COMPLAINT FILED WITH THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL SPECIFY THE RELIEF OR REMEDY REQUESTED.
(3) A PARENT OR GUARDIAN MAY FILE A COMPLAINT WITH THE
COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION ON BEHALF OF:
(I) A MINOR; OR
(II) A STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY WHO HAS REACHED THE AGE
OF 18 YEARS, WHO REMAINS ENROLLED IN A SECONDARY EDUCATION PROGRAM,
AND WHOSE RIGHTS REMAIN WITH A PARENT OR GUARDIAN UNDER THE FEDERAL
INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES EDUCATION ACT.
(4) THE COMMISSION SHALL TREAT A REFERRAL FROM THE STATE
SUPERINTENDENT MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 26–705 OF THIS SUBTITLE IN THE
SAME MANNER AS A COMPLAINT RECEIVED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
ON RECEIPT OF A COMPLAINT UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE OF THE COMPLAINT TO:
(I) THE PROGRAM OR SCHOOL THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF THE
COMPLAINT;
(II) THE COUNTY BOARD FOR THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE
PUBLIC PREKINDERGARTEN PROGRAM OR PUBLIC PRIMARY OR SECONDARY
SCHOOL IS LOCATED; AND

HOUSE BILL 649 17
(III) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT.
(2) UNLESS A COMPLAINANT OBJECTS, THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL
RIGHTS SHALL PROVIDE THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT WITH ALL INFORMATION
REGARDING A COMPLAINT ALLEGING DISCRIMINATION IF THE STATE
SUPERINTENDENT REQUESTS THE INFORMATION.
(3) THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS MAY, AT THE DISCRETION OF
THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS, REFER A COMPLAINT BROUGHT UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION TO THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT TO BE HEARD
IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 26–705 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING A NOTICE UNDER SUBSECTION
(C)(1) OF THIS SECTION, THE PROGRAM OR SCHOOL AND, IF APPROPRIATE, COUNTY
BOARD SHALL SUBMIT A RESPONSE TO THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS.
(E) (1) (I) THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS SHALL ATTEMPT TO
MEDIATE AN AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE COMPLAINANT AND THE RESPONDENT TO
REMEDY AND ELIMINATE THE DISCRIMINATION.
(II) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT MAY ASSIST WITH
MEDIATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, INCLUDING
BY MAKING RECOMMENDATIONS FOR REMEDYING AND ELIMINATING
DISCRIMINATORY PRACTICES.
(III) IF MEDIATION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH RESULTS IN AN AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE PARTIES, THE COMMISSION
ON CIVIL RIGHTS SHALL ISSUE TO BOTH PARTIES A WRITTEN STATEMENT OF THE
MEDIATION FINDINGS AND AGREEMENT, INCLUDING THE TIMELINE WITHIN WHICH
ANY AGREED ACTIONS MUST BE TAKEN.
(2) (I) IF A MEDIATION AGREEMENT IS NOT REACHED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION WITHIN 60 DAYS AFTER THE COMPLAINT IS
FILED, THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS SHALL ISSUE A DECISION ON THE
COMPLAINT TO BOTH PARTIES.
(II) A DECISION ISSUED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL:
1. BE IN WRITING;
2. CONTAIN ANY FINDINGS OF FACT DETERMINED BY
THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT; AND

HOUSE BILL 649
3. SPECIFY ANY ACTIONS NECESSARY TO REMEDY OR
ELIMINATE THE DISCRIMINATION, INCLUDING THE TIMELINE WITHIN WHICH THE
ACTIONS MUST BE TAKEN.
(III) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT MAY ASSIST WITH A
DECISION ISSUED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH BY MAKING
RECOMMENDATIONS ON REMEDYING AND ELIMINATING DISCRIMINATORY
PRACTICES.
(IV) IF THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS FINDS THAT A
COUNTY BOARD, PROGRAM, OR SCHOOL VIOLATED § 26–704 OF THIS SUBTITLE, A
DECISION ISSUED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY REQUEST
THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT TO REQUIRE THE COMPTROLLER TO WITHHOLD
FUNDING FROM THE PROGRAM OR SCHOOL IN AN AMOUNT DETERMINED BY THE
STATE SUPERINTENDENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–303(B) OF THIS ARTICLE.
(F) (1) A COMPLAINANT ALLEGING THAT A COUNTY BOARD, PROGRAM,
OR SCHOOL DID NOT REMEDY OR ELIMINATE THE DISCRIMINATION AS AGREED OR
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION MAY REOPEN A COMPLAINT
MADE UNDER THIS SECTION WITHOUT:
(I) FILING A NEW COMPLAINT UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION; OR
(II) ENGAGING IN MEDIATION UNDER SUBSECTION (E)(1) OF
THIS SECTION.
(2) (I) IF THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS FINDS THAT A
COUNTY BOARD, PROGRAM, OR SCHOOL DID NOT REMEDY OR ELIMINATE THE
DISCRIMINATION AS AGREED OR REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS
SECTION, THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS SHALL:
1. NOTIFY THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT; AND
2. ISSUE AN UPDATED WRITTEN DECISION TO BOTH
PARTIES REQUIRING THAT FUNDING BE WITHHELD FROM THE PROGRAM OR
SCHOOL IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(II) ON RECEIPT OF NOTICE FROM THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL
RIGHTS UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE STATE
SUPERINTENDENT SHALL REQUIRE THE COMPTROLLER TO WITHHOLD FUNDING

HOUSE BILL 649 19
FROM THE PROGRAM OR SCHOOL IN AN AMOUNT DETERMINED BY THE STATE
SUPERINTENDENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–303(B) OF THIS ARTICLE.
(G) A COMPLAINANT OR RESPONDENT MAY APPEAL TO THE OFFICE OF
ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS:
(1) WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING A DECISION ISSUED BY THE
COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS UNDER SUBSECTION (E)(2) OF THIS SECTION; OR
(2) IF THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS DOES NOT ISSUE A
DECISION AS REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (E)(2) OF THIS SECTION, WITHIN 10
DAYS AFTER THE DATE BY WHICH THE DECISION SHOULD HAVE BEEN ISSUED.
(H) (1) AN APPEAL HEARING SHALL BE HELD IN THE COUNTY WHERE THE
ALLEGED DISCRIMINATORY ACT OCCURRED.
(2) IF, AFTER REVIEWING ALL OF THE EVIDENCE, THE
ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE FINDS THAT THE RESPONDENT HAS ENGAGED IN
DISCRIMINATION, THE ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE SHALL:
(I) ISSUE A DECISION AND ORDER STATING THE JUDGE’S
FINDINGS OF FACT AND CONCLUSIONS OF LAW; AND
(II) ISSUE AND CAUSE TO BE SERVED ON THE RESPONDENT AN
ORDER REQUIRING THE RESPONDENT TO:
1. CEASE AND DESIST FROM ENGAGING IN THE
DISCRIMINATION; AND
2. TAKE AFFIRMATIVE ACTION TO EFFECTUATE THE
PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(I) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO ESTABLISH
PROCEDURES FOR COMPLAINT PROCESSING, MEDIATION, AND ENFORCEMENT AND
OTHERWISE CARRY OUT THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS SHALL DEFER TO THE STATE
BOARD AND THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT ON:
(I) MATTERS RELATING TO THE EDUCATION OF STUDENTS;
AND

HOUSE BILL 649
(II) THE AUTHORITY OF THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT UNDER
§ 26–705 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) THE COMMISSION ON CIVIL RIGHTS AND THE STATE BOARD
SHALL JOINTLY SET GUIDELINES FOR DETERMINING WHEN ALLEGATIONS OF
DISCRIMINATORY PRACTICES ARE SUFFICIENT TO WARRANT MEDIATION UNDER
THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.